src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX Y d       d iusi j        d         
SFX Y d       d iusiesiems    d         
SFX Y d       d iusiuosius    d         
SFX Y d       d iusiaisiais   d         
SFX Y d       d iusiuosiuose  d         
SFX Y d       d iusioji       d         
SFX Y d       d iusiosios     d         
SFX Y d       d iusiajai      d         
SFX Y d       d iusi j        d         
SFX Y d       d iusi ja       d         
SFX Y d       d iusiojoje     d         
SFX Y d       d iusiojoj      d         
SFX Y d       d iusiosioms    d         
SFX Y d       d iusi sias     d         
SFX Y d       d iusiosiomis   d         
SFX Y d       d iusiosiose    d         
SFX Y o       imas            o         
SFX Y o       imo             o         
SFX Y o       imui            o         
SFX Y o       im              o         
SFX Y o       imu             o         
SFX Y o       ime             o         
SFX Y o       imai            o         
SFX Y o       im              o         
SFX Y o       imams           o         
SFX Y o       imus            o         
SFX Y o       imais           o         
SFX Y o       imuose          o         
SFX Y         ymas                      
SFX Y         ymo                       
SFX Y         ymui                      
SFX Y         ym                        
SFX Y         ymu                       
SFX Y         yme                       
SFX Y         ymai                      
SFX Y         ym                        
SFX Y         ymams                     
SFX Y         ymus                      
SFX Y         ymais                     
SFX Y         ymuose                    
SFX Y osi     imasis          osi       
SFX Y osi     imosi           osi       
SFX Y osi     imuisi          osi       
SFX Y osi     im si           osi       
SFX Y osi     imusi           osi       
SFX Y osi     imesi           osi       
SFX Y osi     imaisi          osi       
SFX Y osi     im si           osi       
SFX Y osi     imamsis         osi       
SFX Y osi     imusis          osi       
SFX Y osi     imaisis         osi       
SFX Y osi     imuosesi        osi       
SFX Y  si     ymasis           si       
SFX Y  si     ymosi            si       
SFX Y  si     ymuisi           si       
SFX Y  si     ym si            si       
SFX Y  si     ymusi            si       
SFX Y  si     ymesi            si       
SFX Y  si     ymaisi           si       
SFX Y  si     ym si            si       
SFX Y  si     ymamsis          si       
SFX Y  si     ymusis           si       
SFX Y  si     ymaisis          si       
SFX Y  si     ymuosesi         si       
