src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.dic
ait si/Y
ai  si/Y
ambrijo/NXY
anglijo/NXYk
apdalijo/NXY
apgird /SXY
apgniau  /NPSXY
apibarst /SXY
apibrai  /SXY
apibubijo/NXY
apipl   /NPXY
apip d /NXY
apipust /NXY
apkam  /SXY
apkramt /NXY
apmaig /SXY
apmaudijo/NXY
apsidair /NXY
apsigird /SXY
apsiibarst /SXY
apsiiplik /SXY
apsikam  /SXY
apsikraust /SXY
apsim st /SXY
apsita k /SXY
apsiuost /SXY
apta  /SXY
aptvarst /SXY
apvilg /SXY
ard si/PY
a k si/Y
atidaigst /NXY
atidangst /SXY
atitais /NXY
atkraust /SXY
atsibast /NXY
atsiidalijo/SXY
atsiidar /SXY
atsikraust /SXY
atsipra  /NXY
atsivijo/NSXY
auk si/Y
bad /NSXYdefijklpqrwx
baid /NSXYbcdefjklpqrwx
bakijo/NXYjl
bald si/PY
band si/Y
barst /NSXYacdefhjlmnopqrtvx
bir ijo/NXYdl
blaiv /PSXYabdefikmopru
bla k /NPSXYdepqruw
blazgatijo/NXY
braid si/Y
brai  si/PY
bra k /NXY
bubijo/NXYdkl
b gnijo/NXY
cypd /NXY
daigst /NXYacdjkl
dair si/PY
dalijosi/Y
dangst si/Y
dantijosi/Y
dark /NPSXYdekpqw
dau  /NPSXYabcdefhijklmnopqruvwx
da  /NSXYadefhjlmpqrtvx
d st si/Y
drabst /NSXYadefjklmprtvwx
draibst /NXY
draik si/PY
drask si/PY
dribd /NXY
d lijo/NXYl
d myjosi/Y
dvailijo/NXYjkl
d iaust /NXYaefj
galabijo/NXYe
gan /NXYdij
gaubst /NXYl
gaud /DNPSXYadefjkprvw
g dijo/NPSXYfkrvw
gelnijo/NXYejl
gijo/NXYabcdefjklo
gild /NXYk
gimd si/Y
gin ijo/SXYefhprtuvw
gird /NXYdefhjkl
gyd /NSXYabdefjklmpqrx
glabst /NXY
glaist /NXYaefhkltvwx
glam  /NXYf
glaubst /NXY
glaud si/PY
glaust si/Y
gliaud si/Y
gliaumijosi/Y
glost /NSXYadefhijklmnpruvwx
gnaib /NXYadefjkl
gniau  /NPXYbfj
gniu d /NXYk
gobst si/Y
graib si/Y
graibst si/Y
gramd /NXYadjk
grand /NXYadfjk
gras /NXYbcefj
gr   si/Y
grindijo/NXY
grobst /NXYad
grumd /NXYdefk
guld /NXYdefgjkrvw
gund /NXYcjkw
gvald /NXYd
ibarst si/Y
idalijosi/Y
idar si/Y
iplik si/Y
irst si/Y
i brauk /NPSXY
i dantijo/SXY
i d iaust /SXY
i gniau  /SXY
i karp /SXY
i kraust /SXY
i mind /SXY
i murgd /SXY
i plik /SXY
i samst /SXY
i sibast /NXY
i si iustijo/SXY
i sidantijo/SXY
i sid iaust /SXY
i sigiedrijo/NXY
i signiau  /SXY
i sikarp /SXY
i sikraust /SXY
i simind /SXY
i simurgd /SXY
i siraizg /SXY
i sita k /SXY
i ta k /SXY
i vijo/NXY
i  /NXY
jukd /NXYj
junk si/Y
juost /NXY
kai  si/Y
kait si/PY
kalst si/Y
kandijo/NXYdk
kapst si/PY
kard si/Y
karp /NXYcj
karst /NPSXYadejklmprvw
kas si/PY
kaust /NXYahjkl
ker ijo/NXYbn
kild /NXY
kink si/Y
kird si/Y
kiurd /NXYi
klaip si/Y
klast si/PY
kliud /NXYbcfl
klost /DNPSXYabcdejklmnqwx
klupd /NXYfk
knais /NSXYabdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
kniaus /NPSXYcor
konfnzijo/SXY
kontnzijo/NXY
korijo/NXYd
kraip /NSXYdfkpruv
krait /DNXY
krakmolijo/NXY
kramt si/Y
krat /NPSXYabcdefhjklnpqruvwx
kraust /NXYi
kriau  /DNXY
krikd /NXYdk
krik tijosi/Y
kr mijosi/Y
k nijo/NXYt
kurp /DNPXY
laid /NSXYjklwx
laig /NXYf
laik si/PY
laist si/Y
lakst /NPSXYadefiklnpqrv
lamd /NSXYadfijklmpuwx
lamst /NXY
land /NXYdf
lank si/Y
lankst si/PY
las si/Y
lau  si/PY
ledijo/NXYa
likd /NXY
lipd si/Y
liudijo/NXYf
lyd si/Y
lod /NXYk
lop si/Y
maig si/Y
main si/Y
mai  si/PY
mald si/Y
man /NPSXYcdefhijklmopqtuvx
mank /NXYdk
marmalijo/NXYjk
m st /NXYadfhkw
m st si/Y
mat si/PY
maud si/Y
maust /NXYefj
mazg /NXYbdjkl
meilijo/NXYd
m t /NPSXYacdefhijklmpqruvw
migd /NXYfkl
mind /NXYafjkl
mink /NXYdjkl
mintijo/NXY
mirk si/Y
mok /NSXYacdfijpqrtuvw
muilijo/NXYfjk
muist si/PY
murd si/Y
murgd si/Y
m rijosi/Y
m sijo/NXY
nard si/Y
narst /NXYdkl
niurk /NPXYdejkl
novijo/NXYel
nu iustijo/SXY
nugin ijo/NXY
nukarp /SXY
numind /SXY
nuramd /SXY
nusagst /SXY
nusibast /NXY
nusibland /NXY
nusi iustijo/SXY
nusigrand /SXY
nusikraust /SXY
nusiodijo/SXY
nusira k /SXY
nusi aip /NXY
nusisikapst /SXY
nusita k /SXY
nusivijo/NSXY
nuta k /SXY
nuvald /NXY
od si/Y
p/NXY
pa iau  /NPSXY
paguld /SXY
pairst /SXY
pai  /NSXYadefhjklpqrtv
paist /NXYfjk
pakam  /NXY
pakaust /SXY
pakramt /NXY
pakrikd si/Y
pamurd /SXY
panar  /SXY
papa  /SXY
para k /SXY
parsiait /SXY
parsia  /SXY
parsiauk /SXY
parsikraust /SXY
parsi k /SXY
parvijo/NXY
pa  /NXYd
pasibrauk /PSXY
pasi iau  /SXY
pasidieva ijo/NXY
pasigin ijo/NXY
pasigund /SXY
pasikai  /SXY
pasikaust /SXY
pasikivir ijo/NXY
pasimirk /SXY
pasim rijo/SXY
pasiniaukst /NXY
pasipa  /SXY
pasir   /NXY
pasisamd /SXY
pasispjaud /SXY
pasisvaid /SXY
pasitaup /SXY
paskab /SXY
paspjaud /SXY
pasvaid /SXY
pataup /SXY
pavart /DSXY
pelijo/NXYfjk
peln si/Y
perkraust /SXY
perpra  /NXY
persikrik tijo/SXY
pervijo/NXY
pild si/PY
pyd /NXY
pjaust /NSXYacdefjklmoqrvw
pjud /NXYdfk
plaikst si/PY
plei ijo/NXYl
pl   /NPSXYabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
plik /DNXYe
pli rijo/NXY
plunijo/NXYd
prapuld /NXY
pra  si/PY
prasiblaiv /NXY
prasigiedrijo/NXY
pra aid /NPXY
pribrauk /NPSXY
prie pastat /NXY
prigliaud /SXY
prikam  /NXY
pripra  /NXY
prisibast /NXY
prisigird /SXY
prisigrobst /SXY
prisi aip /NXY
prisitvanijo/SXY
pritemd /NXY
priturlijo/NXY
priuost /SXY
prosijo/NXY
p kijo/NXY
purt /NPSXYdefjkqrvw
pust si/Y
rait /NPSXYbdfklnpwx
rai  si/Y
raizg si/Y
ramd si/Y
ramst si/Y
rang si/PY
ra  /NPSXYabcdefhjklmopqrtvwx
ra k /NXYdj
raudonijo/NXYcef
rauk si/PY
raust /NXY
r kd si/Y
rijo/NSXYbdeijkmqtvx
rikd /NXYi
ryd /NXYjk
rod si/PY
r dijo/NXYacdefhijkl
r k si/Y
sagst si/Y
saist /NXYk
sak si/PY
samd /NXYjs
samst /NXYek
sarmatijo/SXYkw
s trijo/NXY
siaust si/Y
sikapst si/Y
si l si/Y
siulpst si/Y
siund si/Y
skab /NXYdejk
skaid /NSXYdkpw
skait /NPSXYbcdefhjklmnoqrtvx
skalambijo/NXY
skald si/Y
skandalijo/NXY
skiepijo/NXYcfhk
skirst /NPSXYdefhjkprtuw
sklaid /NSXYdfhipru
sklaist /NXY
skland /NXYef
skliaud /NPSXYabkmnw
skraid /NXYf
slank /NXY
slapst /NSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
slaug /DNXYadf
smaig /NXYejk
smaigst si/PY
smauk /NPXY
smukd /NXYek
spand /NXYf
spard si/PY
spaud si/PY
spjaud si/Y
springd /NXY
stabd /NSXYafjklrw
stat /NPSXYabcdefhjklmnopqrtvwx
stebeilijo/SXY
stingd /NXYk
stumd /NPSXYadefhijkmpqruw
stvarst /NXYd
subrauk /NPSXY
s d si/Y
suglaist /SXY
sugniau  /PSXY
sukam  /SXY
sukink /SXY
sukramt /NXY
sukurp /NPSXY
sulipd /SXY
sulop /SXY
sumast /SXY
sum rijo/SXY
sunkst /NXY
supra  /NXY
suraizg /SXY
surikd /SXY
susagst /SXY
susiad /SXY
susid iaust /SXY
susiglaist /SXY
susigniau  /PSXY
susijo/NPXY
susikarp /SXY
susikivir ijo/NXY
susilas /SXY
susilyd /SXY
susimaig /SXY
susimaust /SXY
susipa  /SXY
susira k /SXY
susir k /SXY
susisamd /SXY
susita k /SXY
susitrai k /SXY
susi kst /NXY
susivarp /SXY
su lyjo/NXY
sutaup /SXY
suturlijo/NXY
suvaidijo/SXY
suvilg /SXY
svaid si/Y
taik /NPSXYbcdefjklqrvw
taikst /NPSXYw
tais si/PY
tala ijo/NXY
tamp /NSXYabdefijklmpruvw
tap /NXYel
tar  /NPSXYdjkpw
t s /NPSXYadfjklmrw
t s si/PY
ta k si/Y
taup si/Y
temd /SXYakmw
terlijo/NPSXY
tild /DNXYefjlrvx
tirpd si/Y
trai k /NXYdfjl
traldijo/NXY
tramd si/Y
trank si/PY
triaunijo/NXYk
trikd si/Y
trukd si/Y
tupd /NXYefkl
turlijosi/Y
tvanijosi/Y
tvard /NXY
tvark /NSXYaefhkmqrtuvw
tvarst /NXYdek
tvatijo/NXYdkl
tvilk si/Y
ugd /NXYl
uost /NXYdfkw
u ad /SXY
u gin ijo/NXY
u kramt /NXY
u lipd /SXY
u maust /SXY
u plik /SXY
u r k /SXY
u siad /SXY
u sikam  /SXY
u silipd /SXY
u simaust /SXY
u siplik /SXY
u sisagst /SXY
u temd /NXY
u vald /NXY
vaidijosi/PY
vaik si/PY
vais /NXYcdj
vald /SXYacfklmrvwx
val si/Y
valkst /NPSXYaehl
vambrijo/NXY
vandenijo/NXYf
vardijo/NXYcdfh
varp /NXYd
varst /NSXYcdfhjklnpqtwx
vart si/Y
var  si/PY
v t /NXYdj
vienijo/SXYakw
vijo/SXYabcdefgjkmnopqrvw
vilg /NXYbf
vilkst /DNXY
vimd /NXY
virkd si/Y
vykd /NXYc
vyst si/Y
zambijo/NXY
zurnijo/NXY
